nl: Haak materiaal: 304-roestvrij staal; 316-roestvrij staal; Aluminium; Koolstofstaal; Gegalvaniseerd staal; Roestvrij staal; Titanium; Overig
sk-SK: Materiál háku: Nerezová oceľ 304; Nerezová oceľ 316; Hliník; Uhlíková oceľ; Pozinkovaná oceľ; Nerezová oceľ; Titán; Iné
it: Materiale per ganci: Acciaio inossidabile 304; Acciaio inossidabile 316; Alluminio; Acciaio al carbonio; Acciaio zincato; Acciaio inossidabile; Titanio; Altro
pt-PT: Material do gancho: Aço inoxidável 304; Aço inoxidável 316; Alumínio; Aço carbono; Aço galvanizado; Aço inoxidável; Titânio; Outro
pl: Materiał haka: Stal nierdzewna 304; Stal nierdzewna 316; Aluminium; Stal węglowa; Stal ocynkowana; Stal nierdzewna; Tytan; Inny
en: Hook material: 304 stainless steel; 316 stainless steel; Aluminum; Carbon steel; Galvanized steel; Stainless steel; Titanium; Other
ko: 후크 재질: 304 스테인리스 스틸; 316 스테인리스 스틸; 알루미늄; 탄소강; 아연 도금강; 스테인리스 스틸; 티타늄; 기타
bg-BG: Материал на куката: Неръждаема стомана 304; Неръждаема стомана 316; Алуминий; Въглеродна стомана; Поцинкована стомана; Неръждаема стомана; Титан; Друго
ro-RO: Materialul cârligului: Oțel inoxidabil 304; Oțel inoxidabil 316; Aluminiu; Oțel carbon; Oțel galvanizat; Oțel inoxidabil; Titan; Altele
zh-TW: 鉤子材質: 304 不鏽鋼; 316 不鏽鋼; 鋁; 碳鋼; 鍍鋅鋼; 不鏽鋼; 鈦; 其他
th: วัสดุตะขอ: สเตนเลสสตีล 304; สเตนเลสสตีล 316; อะลูมิเนียม; เหล็กคาร์บอน; เหล็กกัลวาไนซ์; สเตนเลสสตีล; ไทเทเนียม; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Materijal kuke: Nehrđajući čelik 304; Nehrđajući čelik 316; Aluminij; Ugljični čelik; Pocinčani čelik; Nehrđajući čelik; Titanij; Ostalo
nb: Krokmateriale: 304 rustfritt stål; 316 rustfritt stål; Aluminium; Karbonstål; Galvanisert stål; Rustfritt stål; Titan; Annet
pt-BR: Gancho material: Aço inoxidável 304; Aço inoxidável 316; Alumínio; Aço carbono; Aço galvanizado; Aço inoxidável; Titânio; Outros
ru: Материал крюка: Нержавеющая сталь 304; Нержавеющая сталь 316; Алюминий; Углеродистая сталь; Оцинкованная сталь; Нержавеющая сталь; Титан; Другое
da: Krogmateriale: 304 rustfrit stål; 316 rustfrit stål; Aluminium; Kulstofstål; Galvaniseret stål; Rustfrit stål; Titanium; Andet
fr: Matériau du crochet: Acier inoxydable 304; Acier inoxydable 316; Aluminium; Acier au carbone; Acier galvanisé; Acier inoxydable; Titane; Autre
zh-CN: 钩面材料: 304 不锈钢; 316 不锈钢; 铝; 碳钢; 镀锌钢; 不锈钢; 钛; 其他
es: Material del gancho: Acero inoxidable 304; Acero inoxidable 316; Aluminio; Acero al carbono; Acero galvanizado; Acero inoxidable; Titanio; Otro
tr: Kanca malzemesi: 304 paslanmaz çelik; 316 paslanmaz çelik; Alüminyum; Karbon çelik; Galvanizli çelik; Paslanmaz çelik; Titanyum; Diğer
cs: Materiál háčků: Nerezová ocel 304; Nerezová ocel 316; Hliník; Uhlíková ocel; Pozinkovaná ocel; Nerezová ocel; Titan; Jiné
lt-LT: Kabliuko medžiaga: 304 nerūdijantis plienas; 316 nerūdijantis plienas; Aliuminis; Anglinis plienas; Cinkuotas plienas; Nerūdijantis plienas; Titanas; Kita
fi: Koukun materiaali: 304 ruostumaton teräs; 316 ruostumaton teräs; Alumiini; Hiiliteräs; Galvanoitu teräs; Ruostumaton teräs; Titaani; Muu
ja: フック素材: 304 ステンレススチール; 316 ステンレススチール; アルミニウム; カーボンスチール; 亜鉛メッキスチール; ステンレススチール; チタン; その他
hu: Horog anyaga: 304-es rozsdamentes acél; 316-os rozsdamentes acél; Alumínium; Szénacél; Horganyzott acél; Rozsdamentes acél; Titán; Egyéb
de: Hakenmaterial: Edelstahl 304; Edelstahl 316; Aluminium; Kohlenstoffstahl; Verzinkter Stahl; Edelstahl; Titan; Andere
sv: Krokmaterial: Rostfritt stål 304; Rostfritt stål 316; Aluminium; Kolstål; Galvaniserat stål; Rostfritt stål; Titan; Annat
vi: Chất liệu móc: Thép không gỉ 304; Thép không gỉ 316; Nhôm; Thép carbon; Thép mạ kẽm; Thép không gỉ; Titan; Khác
sl-SI: Material trnka: Nerjavno jeklo 304; Nerjavno jeklo 316; Aluminij; Ogljikovo jeklo; Pocinkano jeklo; Nerjavno jeklo; Titan; Drugo
el: Υλικό αγκιστριού: Ανοξείδωτο ατσάλι 304; Ανοξείδωτο ατσάλι 316; Αλουμίνιο; Ανθρακούχος χάλυβας; Γαλβανισμένος χάλυβας; Ανοξείδωτο ατσάλι; Τιτάνιο; Άλλο